Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB516.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 61.552 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Called to Active Duty Military Service. An employee of an employer participating
in the system who is called to active military duty in the Armed Forces of the
United States shall be credited in accordance with 38 U.S.C. sec. 4318 with service
credit, creditable compensation, and in the case of employees participating in the
hybrid cash balance plan, employee contributions, employer credits, and interest
credits, for a period of active military duty of up to six (6) years, provided:
(a) The employee was called to active military duty in the Armed Forces of the
United States:
1. After the employee's membership date in the system and provided the
employee was on leave of absence from the employer and did not
withdraw his or her accumulated account balance; or
2. Prior to the employee's membership date in the system and the date the
employee terminated employment with his or her employer;
(b) The employee entered active military service within three (3) months of his or
her last day of paid employment;
(c) The employee's discharge military service was terminated in a manner other
than as described in 38 U.S.C. sec. 4304;
(d) The employee returns to work with an employer participating in the system
within two (2) years after completion of the period of active military duty, or
upon the subsequent termination of any total disability which existed at the
expiration of the two (2) years after discharge; and
(e) For an employee whose membership date is on or after January 1, 2014, who
is participating in the hybrid cash balance plan under KRS 16.583, 61.597,
78.5512, or 78.5516, the employee pays the employee contributions on the
Page 1 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
credited compensation as provided under KRS 16.543, 61.543, and 78.615.
For periods of active military duty that meet the requirements of this subsection, the
employer shall pay the employer contributions payable under KRS 61.565, 61.702,
78.5536, and 78.635.
(2) (a) 1. Omitted Service. Any person who is entitled to service credit for
employment which was not reported by the employer in accordance with
KRS 16.543, 61.543, or 78.615 may obtain credit for the service subject
to the provisions of paragraphs (c) to (e) of this subsection, as
applicable.
[(b)] 2. Provided the person pays for the omitted service [with ]within six (6)
months of notification by the system, the cost of the service shall be
equal to the employee contributions that would have been paid if the
person had been correctly reported in accordance with KRS 16.543,
61.543, or 78.615.
[(c)] 3. Any employee participating in one (1) of the state-administered
retirement systems entitled to service credit under [paragraph
(a)]subparagraph 1. of this paragraph[subsection] who has not repaid
the employee contributions due within six (6) months of notification by
the system may purchase the credit after the six (6) months by paying to
the system the employee contributions plus interest at the actuarially
assumed rate from the date of initial notification under subparagraph 2.
of this paragraph[ (b) of this subsection].
(b) 1. Probationary Service. Any employee who served in a probationary
position that was ineligible for participation in the County Employees
Retirement System pursuant to subsection (21)(d) of Section 2 of this
Act may purchase service in the system subject to paragraphs (c) to (e)
of this subsection, as applicable, provided the employee:
Page 2 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
a. Successfully completed the entire period of probationary service
with the same employer;
b. Averaged one hundred (100) or more hours of work per month
on a calendar or fiscal year basis during the period of
probationary employment;
c. Is employed by the same participating employer at the time of the
service purchase; and
d. The employee purchases the service within six (6) months of
successfully completing the probationary period.
2. The cost of the probationary service to the employee shall be equal to
the employee and employer contributions that would have been
payable if the employee had been employed in a regular full-time
position and reported in accordance with KRS 78.615.
3. An individual employer may elect to pay employer contributions due
under subparagraph 2. of this paragraph on behalf of its employees,
and the system shall provide notification to the employer when the
employee has paid employee contributions.
4. Service credit shall not be credited to the member's account until both
the employer and employee contributions are received by the system.
(c)[(d)] Omitted service and probationary service purchased under this
subsection shall:
1. Be considered service credited under KRS 16.543(1), 61.543(1), or
78.615(1) for purposes of determining eligibility for retirement benefits
under KRS 78.510 to 78.852; and
2. Not be credited to the member's account until the employer
contributions due and any interest or penalties on the delinquent
employer contributions for the period of omitted service are received by
Page 3 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
the system.
(d)[(e)] Employees who begin participating on or after January 1, 2014, in the
hybrid cash balance plan provided by KRS 16.583 or 61.597 or 78.5512
or 78.5516 shall, upon payment of the employee and employer
contributions due under this subsection, have their accumulated account
balance increased by the employee contributions, employer pay credits,
and interest credits that would have been credited to their member's
account if the contributions had been paid on time.
(e)[(f)] Contributions payable by the employer under this subsection [for
omitted service ]shall be considered delinquent:
1. In the case of omitted service, from the date the employee should
have been reported and received service credit in accordance with
KRS 16.543, 61.543, and 78.615; and
2. In the case of probationary service in which the employer has
elected to pay the employer contribution, three (3) months
following notification by the system of the employer's cost as
provided in paragraph (b)3. of this subsection.
(3) (a) Recontribution of a Refund. Any employee participating in one (1) of the
state-administered retirement systems who has been refunded his or her
accumulated account balance under the provisions of KRS 61.625, thereby
losing service credit in the system, may regain the credit by paying to the
system the amount or amounts refunded by the system with interest at a rate
determined by the board. Service purchased under this subsection on or after
January 1, 2014, shall not be used to determine the member's membership
date in the systems.
(b) Recontribution of a refund purchased under this subsection shall not be used
in determining a retirement allowance until the member has accrued at least
Page 4 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
six (6) months of service credit in a state-administered retirement system,
excluding the service purchased under this subsection. If the member does not
accrue at least six (6) months of service credit in a state-administered
retirement system, excluding service purchased under this subsection, then the
payment plus interest as provided in KRS 16.560, 61.575, or 78.640 shall be
refunded upon retirement, death, or written request following termination of
employment. The service requirement shall be waived if the member dies or
becomes disabled as provided for by KRS 16.582, 61.600, 61.621, 78.5522, or
78.5524.
(4) (a) Summer Months. Any employee participating in one (1) of the state-
administered retirement systems who is or has been employed by a school
board or community action agency participating in the County Employees
Retirement System or a state-operated school under KRS Chapter 167 or an
institution of higher learning participating in the Kentucky Employees
Retirement System, who receives service credit for less than twelve (12)
months each year, may purchase the additional months of service credit
needed to total one (1) year of service credit, except the amount purchased for
any specific year shall not exceed three (3) months.
(b) The cost of the summer months service credit shall be determined by the
formula established by subsection (10) of this section and may be purchased
by the employee, or the employer on behalf of the employee, or the cost may
be paid by both the employer and employee in which case the employer and
employee shall each pay fifty percent (50%) of the cost. Service credit shall
not be credited to the member's account until both the employer's and
employee's payment are received by the system.
(c) If the employee has purchased service credit under this subsection based on
months reported by the employer for the fiscal year, and an audit of the
Page 5 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
employee's account reduces the number of months of service credit for which
the employee is eligible to no fewer than nine (9) months, the employee shall
retain credit for the months purchased unless the employee is ineligible for
any service in the fiscal year. The employee shall be eligible to purchase the
additional months under this subsection to total one (1) year.
(d) This subsection shall not apply to members who began participating in the
County Employees Retirement System on or after January 1, 2014.
(5) Vested Service Purchases. Any employee who began participating in the County
Employees Retirement System, the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, or the
State Police Retirement System prior to January 1, 2014, who is vested may
purchase service credit for:
(a) Past service. "Past service" means periods of employment:
1. Between July 1, 1956, in the case of the Kentucky Employees
Retirement System, or July 1, 1958, in the case of the County
Employees Retirement System, and the effective date of participation by
the employer; or
2. With a public agency that did not participate in the Kentucky Employees
Retirement System but would have been eligible to participate under
KRS 61.520 or a political subdivision that did not participate in the
County Employees Retirement System but would have been eligible to
participate under KRS 78.530, provided the public agency or political
subdivision has merged with or been taken over by a participating
employer;
(b) State university service, provided the university does not participate in a state-
administered retirement system and the university service being purchased
was in a nonteaching position that did not participate in a defined benefit
retirement program;
Page 6 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
(c) 1. Up to ten (10) years of out-of-state service. "Out-of-state" means service
credited to a state or local government-administered public defined
benefit plan in another state that is not a defined benefit plan for
teachers.
2. Up to ten (10) years of out-of-state hazardous service. "Out-of-state
hazardous service" means service in a regular full-time position that was
credited to a defined benefit retirement plan administered by a state or
local government in another state, if the service could be certified as
hazardous pursuant to KRS 61.592 or 78.5520, as applicable. The
employee may purchase out-of-state hazardous service under this
subparagraph provided the employee is vested to receive benefits from
the State Police Retirement System or hazardous duty benefits from the
Kentucky Employees Retirement System or the County Employees
Retirement System.
The employee must purchase out-of-state service or out-of-state hazardous
service in the system in which he or she is vested based solely upon the
service in that system;
(d) Active military duty, which means periods of active military duty in the
Armed Forces of the United States, provided:
1. The employee's military service was terminated in a manner other than
as described in 38 U.S.C. sec. 4304; and
2. The service has not been credited as free military service under
subsection (1) of this section;
(e) National Guard service. An employee may purchase one (1) month of service
for each six (6) months of service in the National Guard or the military
reserves of the United States. The service shall be treated as service earned
prior to participation in the system;
Page 7 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
(f) Federal service. "Federal service" means service with the United States
government, that is not service in the Armed Forces;
(g) Seasonal, emergency, interim, probationary not purchased within the time
established by subsection (2) of this section, or temporary employment or
part-time employment as provided by KRS 61.510(21) or 78.510(21)
averaging one hundred (100) or more hours of work per month on a calendar
or fiscal year basis. If the average number of hours of work is less than one
hundred (100) per month, the member may purchase credit for only those
months he or she receives creditable compensation for one hundred (100)
hours of work;
(h) Part-time employment in a noncertified position at a school board prior to the
1990-91 school year which averaged eighty (80) or more hours of work per
month on a calendar or fiscal year basis. If the average number of hours of
work is less than eighty (80) per month, the noncertified employee of a school
board shall be allowed to purchase credit only for those months he or she
receives creditable compensation for eighty (80) hours of work;
(i) Any period of:
1. Authorized maternity leave without pay or sick leave without pay;
2. Unpaid leave authorized under the federal Family and Medical Leave
Act;
3. Approved educational leave; and
4. Agency-approved leave to work for a work-related labor organization if
the agency subsequently participated in the County Employees
Retirement System, but only if the board receives a favorable private
letter ruling from the United States Internal Revenue Service or a
favorable opinion letter from the United States Department of Labor;
(j) Non-participating employer service, which means periods of employment
Page 8 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
with the following types of agencies provided the agency does not participate
in a state-administered retirement system:
1. A regional community services program for mental health organized and
operated under the provisions of KRS 210.370 to 210.480;
2. A community action agency created under KRS 273.405 to 273.453.
The service provided by this subparagraph shall be purchased in the
County Employees Retirement System;
3. An area development district created pursuant to KRS 147A.050; or
4. A business development corporation created pursuant to KRS 155.001
to 155.230, provided the system receives a favorable private letter ruling
from the United States Internal Revenue Service or a favorable opinion
letter from the United States Department of Labor;
(k) Urban-county government service, which means employment in an urban-
county government position that would qualify for hazardous duty coverage
under KRS 61.592 or 78.5520. The provisions of this paragraph shall only be
applicable to vested members participating in the State Police Retirement
System or in a hazardous position in the Kentucky Employees Retirement
System or the County Employees Retirement System;
(l) Periods of service as assistants to officers and employees of the General
Assembly for persons who were unable to acquire service under KRS
61.510(20) for service performed after January 1, 1960;
(m) Service as a volunteer in the Kentucky Peace Corps, created by KRS 154.1-
720; and
(n) Employment with a vocational technical school in a noncertified part-time
position averaging eighty (80) or more hours per month, determined by using
the number of months actually worked within a calendar or fiscal year. The
service provided by this paragraph shall be purchased in the Kentucky
Page 9 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
Employees Retirement System.
(6) Non-qualified service. Provided the employee's membership date in the system is
prior to July 15, 2002, and provided the employee has total service in all state-
administered retirement systems of at least one hundred eighty (180) months of
service credit, the employee may purchase a combined maximum total of five (5)
years of service credit, known as non-qualified service, which is not otherwise
purchasable under any of the provisions of KRS 16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to
61.705, or 78.510 to 78.852. The service purchased under this paragraph shall not
be used in determining a retirement allowance until the member has accrued at least
two hundred forty (240) months of service, excluding service purchased under this
subsection. If the member does not accrue at least two hundred forty (240) months
of service, excluding service purchased under this subsection, upon retirement,
death, or written request following termination, the payment, plus interest as
provided in KRS 16.560, 61.575, or 78.640, as applicable, shall be refunded.
(7) For purposes of service purchased under subsections (2) to (6) of this section:
(a) Except for subsection (6) of this section, the service must qualify as regular
full-time as provided by KRS 61.510 and 78.510;
(b) No service credit may be purchased for periods already credited to the system
or another public defined benefit retirement fund, including non-qualified
service purchased in another state-administered retirement system;
(c) Except as provided by paragraph (a)2.a. of subsection (9) of this section, the
employee payment for service purchases shall not be picked up, as described
in KRS 16.545(4), 61.560(4), or 78.610(4), by the employer;
(d) Except for service purchased under subsection (2) or (3) of this section,
service purchases made pursuant to this section may be purchased by the
entire amount of service available or by increments. Service purchases made
pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall only be purchased by
Page 10 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
the entire amount of service available; and
(e) Service purchases as provided by subsections (5)(b), (d) to (f), and (j)1. and
(6) of this section may be purchased in any system in which the member has
service credit.
(8) (a) Employer purchase of past service. Any employer participating in the system
may purchase service credit, between July 1, 1956, in the case of the
Kentucky Employees Retirement System, or July 1, 1958, in the case of the
County Employees Retirement System, and the participation date of the
employer, for present employees of the county or department who have
elected coverage under KRS 61.525(2) or 78.540(1), provided the employee
began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014.
(b) A Kentucky Employees Retirement System employer shall pay the cost of the
service credit within the fiscal year the election is made to purchase the
service credit. A County Employees Retirement System employer may
purchase the service, with interest at the rate actuarially assumed by the board,
over a period not to exceed ten (10) years.
(c) If an employer elects to purchase service under the provisions of this
subsection, any present employee who would be eligible to receive service
credit under the provisions of this subsection and has purchased service credit
under subsection (5)(a) of this section shall have his or her payment for the
service credit refunded with interest at the rate paid under KRS 61.575 or
78.640.
(d) Any payments made by an employer under this subsection shall be deposited
to the retirement allowance account of the system and these funds shall not be
considered accumulated contributions of the individual members.
(9) (a) An employee participating in the system may purchase service credit under
any of the provisions of KRS 16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, or 78.510 to
Page 11 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
78.852 for which he or she is eligible to purchase, or as otherwise required by
38 U.S.C. ch. 43, by:
1. Making a lump-sum payment on a before-tax basis as provided in
subparagraph 3. of this paragraph, or on an after-tax basis if the
employee is purchasing service credit under subsection (1) or (3) of this
section, service available pursuant to 38 U.S.C. ch. 43 not otherwise
provided for in this section, or grandfathered service as defined in
paragraph (b) of this subsection;
2. Entering into an agreement to purchase service credit through an
installment purchase of service agreement with the systems as provided
by paragraph (c) of this subsection:
a. On a before-tax basis in which the service is purchased pursuant to
the employer pick-up provisions in 26 U.S.C. sec. 414(h)(2); or
b. On an after-tax basis if the employee is purchasing service credit
under subsection (1) or (3) of this section, service available
pursuant to 38 U.S.C. ch. 43 not otherwise provided for in this
section, or grandfathered service as defined in paragraph (b) of this
subsection; or
3. Transferring funds to the system through a direct trustee-to-trustee
transfer as permitted under the applicable sections of the Internal
Revenue Code and any regulations or rulings issued thereunder, through
a direct rollover as contemplated by and permitted under 26 U.S.C. sec.
401(a)(31) and any regulations or rulings issued thereunder, or through a
rollover of funds pursuant to and permitted under the rules specified in
26 U.S.C. secs. 402(c) and 408(d)(3). The system shall accept the
transfer or rollover to the extent permitted under the rules specified in
the applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code and any
Page 12 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
regulations and rulings issued thereunder.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "grandfathered service" means service
purchases for which a member, whose membership date in the system is prior
to July 1, 1999, is eligible to purchase under KRS 16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to
61.705, or 78.510 to 78.852, that were available for all members of the system
to purchase on August 5, 1997.
(c) 1. For service purchased under a before-tax or after-tax installment
purchase of service agreement as provided by paragraph (a)2. of this
subsection, the cost of the service shall be computed in the same manner
as for a lump-sum payment which shall be the principal, except that
interest compounded annually at the actuarial rate in effect at the time
the member elects to make the purchase shall be added for the period
that the installments are to be made.
2. Multiple service purchases may be combined under a single installment
agreement, except that no employee may make more than one (1)
installment purchase at the same time.
3. For after-tax installment purchase of service agreements, the employee
may elect to stop the installment payments by notifying the system; may
have the installment purchase recalculated to add one (1) or more
additional service purchases; or may pay by lump sum the remaining
principal or a portion of the remaining principal.
4. Before-tax installment purchase of service agreements shall be
irrevocable, and the employee shall not be able to stop installment
payments or to pay off the remaining balance of the purchase of service
agreement, except upon termination of employment or death.
5. One (1) year of installment payments shall be made for each one
thousand dollars ($1,000) or any part thereof of the total cost, except
Page 13 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
that the total period allowed for installments shall not be less than one
(1) year and shall not exceed five (5) years.
6. The employee shall pay the installments by payroll deduction for after-
tax purchase of service agreements, and the employer shall pick up
installments for before-tax purchase of service agreements. Upon
notification by the system, the employer shall report the installment
payments monthly continuously over each twelve (12) month period at
the same time as, but separate from, regular employee contributions on
the forms or by the computer format specified by the board.
7. The system shall determine how much of the total cost represents
payment for one (1) month of the service to be purchased and shall
credit one (1) month of service to the member's account each time this
amount has been paid. The first service credited shall represent the first
calendar month of the service to be purchased and each succeeding
month of service credit shall represent the succeeding months of that
service.
8. If the employee utilizing an installment purchase of service agreement
dies, retires, does not continue employment in a position required to
participate in the system, or elects to stop an after-tax installment
purchase of service agreement, the member, or in the case of death, the
beneficiary, shall have sixty (60) days to pay the remaining principal or
a portion of the remaining principal of the installment purchase of
service agreement by lump sum, subject to the restrictions of paragraph
(a)1. of this subsection, or by transfer of funds under paragraph (a)3. of
this subsection, except that payment by the member shall be filed with
the system prior to the member's effective retirement date. If the
member or beneficiary does not pay the remaining cost, the system shall
Page 14 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
refund to the member or the beneficiary the payment, payments, or
portion of a payment that does not represent a full month of service
purchased, except as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
9. If the employer does not report installment payments on an employee
for sixty (60) days for an after-tax installment purchase of service
agreement, except in the case of employees on military leave or sick
leave without pay, the installment purchase shall cease and the system
shall refund to the employee the payment, payments, or portion of a
payment that does not represent a full month of service purchased.
10. Installment payments of employees on military leave or sick leave
without pay shall be suspended during the period of leave and shall
resume without recalculation upon the employee's return from leave.
11. If payments have ceased under subparagraph 8. or 9. of this paragraph
and the member later becomes a participating employee in the County
Employees Retirement System, Kentucky Employees Retirement
System, or State Police Retirement System, the employee may complete
the adjusted original installment purchase by lump sum or installment
payments, subject to the restrictions of this subsection. If the employee
elects to renew the installment purchase, the cost of the remaining
service shall be recalculated in accordance with subsection (10) of this
section.
(d) Member payments, including interest, properly received pursuant to this
subsection, shall be deposited to the member's account and considered as
accumulated contributions of the individual member.
(10) (a) The cost of purchasing service credit under any provision of this section,
except as provided by subsections (1) to (3) of this section, shall be
determined by multiplying the higher of the employee's current rate of pay,
Page 15 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
final rate of pay, or final compensation as of the end of the month in which
the purchase is made times the actuarial factor times the number of years of
service being purchased. The actuarial factor used to determine the cost of
purchasing service credit shall assume the earliest date the member may retire
without a reduction in benefits and the cost-of-living adjustments provided to
members upon retirement.
(b) Service purchased on or after August 1, 2004, under the provisions of KRS
16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, or 78.510 to 78.852, except for service
purchased under subsections (1) to (3) of this section or service purchased as
described by paragraph (d) of this subsection, shall not be used to determine
eligibility for or the amount of the monthly insurance contribution under KRS
61.702 or 78.5536.
(c) For a member whose membership date is on or after August 1, 2004, service
purchased under the provisions of KRS 16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, or
78.510 to 78.852, except for service purchased under subsections (1) to (3) of
this section or service purchased as described by paragraph (d) of this
subsection:
1. Shall not be used to determine eligibility for a retirement allowance
under disability retirement, early retirement, normal retirement, or upon
death of the member under any of the provisions of KRS 16.505 to
16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, or 78.510 to 78.852; and
2. Shall only be used to determine the amount of the retirement allowance
of a member who is eligible for a retirement allowance under disability,
early retirement, normal retirement, or upon death of the member under
any of the provisions of KRS 16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, or
78.510 to 78.852, based on service earned as a participating employee.
(d) Paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection shall not apply to a member who was
Page 16 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
bound by an educational contract as a conditional employee to the state of
Kentucky prior to December 31, 2003, regardless of membership date in the
system. Educational leave, seasonal service, or any other qualified service
purchased by a member with this classification under this section shall be
used to determine eligibility for benefits, membership dates, and the amount
of benefit for:
1. A retirement allowance under disability retirement, early retirement,
normal retirement, or death under any of the provisions of KRS 16.505
to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, and 78.510 to 78.852; and
2. The monthly insurance contribution under KRS 61.702 or 78.5536.
Section 2. KRS 78.510 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 78.510 to 78.852, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "System" means the County Employees Retirement System created by KRS 78.510
to 78.852;
(2) "Board" means the board of trustees of the system as provided in KRS 78.782;
(3) "County" means any county, or nonprofit organization created and governed by a
county, counties, or elected county officers, sheriff and his or her employees,
county clerk and his or her employees, circuit clerk and his or her deputies, former
circuit clerks or former circuit clerk deputies, or political subdivision or
instrumentality, including school boards, cities, charter county governments, urban-
county governments, consolidated local governments, or unified local governments
participating in the system by order appropriate to its governmental structure, as
provided in KRS 78.530, and if the board is willing to accept the agency,
organization, or corporation, the board being hereby granted the authority to
determine the eligibility of the agency to participate;
(4) "School board" means:
(a) Any board of education participating in the system by order appropriate to its
Page 17 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
governmental structure, as provided in KRS 78.530, and if the board is willing
to accept the agency or corporation, the board being hereby granted the
authority to determine the eligibility of the agency to participate; or
(b) A public charter school as defined in KRS 160.1590 if the public charter
school satisfies the criteria set by the Internal Revenue Service to participate
in a governmental retirement plan;
(5) "Examiner" means the medical examiners as provided in KRS 61.665;
(6) "Employee" means every regular full-time appointed or elective officer or
employee of a participating county and the coroner of a participating county,
whether or not he or she qualifies as a regular full-time officer. The term shall not
include persons engaged as independent contractors, seasonal, emergency,
temporary, and part-time workers. Solely for the purpose of benefits payable to
employees who become disabled as a direct result of an act in line of duty as
defined in this section, or who die as a direct result of an act in line of duty as
defined in this section, or who die as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in
KRS 61.621, or who become disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as
defined in KRS 61.621, a person employed in a probationary position as provided
by subsection (21)(d) of this section shall be considered an employee. In case of
any doubt, the board shall determine if a person is an employee within the meaning
of KRS 78.510 to 78.852;
(7) "Employer" means a county, as defined in subsection (3) of this section, the elected
officials of a county, or any authority of the county having the power to appoint or
elect an employee to office or employment in the county;
(8) "Member" means:
(a) Any employee who is included in the membership of the system or any
former employee whose membership has not ceased under KRS 78.535; and
(b) Solely for the purpose of benefits payable to employees who become
Page 18 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
disabled as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in this section,
or who die as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in this
section, or who die as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS
61.621, or who become disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as
defined in KRS 61.621, a person employed in a:
1. Regular full-time position; or
2. Probationary position as provided by subsection (21)(d) of this section;
(9) "Service" means the total of current service and prior service as defined in this
section;
(10) "Current service" means the number of years and months of employment as an
employee, on and after July 1, 1958, for which creditable compensation is paid and
employee contributions deducted, except as otherwise provided;
(11) "Prior service" means the number of years and completed months, expressed as a
fraction of a year, of employment as an employee, prior to July 1, 1958, for which
creditable compensation was paid. An employee shall be credited with one (1)
month of prior service only in those months he or she received compensation for at
least one hundred (100) hours of work. Twelve (12) months of current service in the
system shall be required to validate prior service;
(12) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all amounts deducted from the
compensation of a member and credited to his or her individual account in the
members' account, including employee contributions picked up after August 1,
1982, pursuant to KRS 78.610(4), together with interest credited, on the amounts,
and any other amounts the member shall have contributed thereto, including interest
credited thereon. "Accumulated contributions" shall not include employee
contributions that are deposited into accounts established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec.
401(h) within the fund established in KRS 78.520, as prescribed by KRS
78.5536(3)(b);
Page 19 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
(13) "Creditable compensation":
(a) Except as limited by paragraph (c) of this subsection, means all salary, wages,
and fees, including payments for compensatory time, paid to the employee as
a result of services performed for the employer or for time during which the
member is on paid leave, which are includable on the member's federal form
W-2 wage and tax statement under the heading "wages, tips, other
compensation", including employee contributions picked up after August 1,
1982, pursuant to KRS 78.610(4). The creditable compensation of fee officers
who receive salary, fees, maintenance, or other perquisites as a result of their
official duties is the gross amount received decreased by the cost of salary
paid deputies and clerks and the cost of office supplies and other official
expenses;
(b) Includes:
1. Lump-sum bonuses, severance pay, or employer-provided payments for
purchase of service credit, which shall be averaged over the employee's
service with the system in which it is recorded if it is equal to or greater
than one thousand dollars ($1,000);
2. Cases where compensation includes maintenance and other perquisites,
but the board shall fix the value of that part of the compensation not paid
in money;
3. Lump-sum payments for creditable compensation paid as a result of an
order of a court of competent jurisdiction, the Personnel Board, or the
Kentucky Commission on Human Rights, or for any creditable
compensation paid in anticipation of settlement of an action before a
court of competent jurisdiction, the Personnel Board, or the Kentucky
Commission on Human Rights, including notices of violations of state
or federal wage and hour statutes or violations of state or federal
Page 20 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
discrimination statutes, which shall be credited to the fiscal year during
which the wages were earned or should have been paid by the employer.
This subparagraph shall also include lump-sum payments for reinstated
wages pursuant to KRS 61.569, which shall be credited to the period
during which the wages were earned or should have been paid by the
employer;
4. Amounts which are not includable in the member's gross income by
virtue of the member having taken a voluntary salary reduction provided
for under applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code; and
5. Elective amounts for qualified transportation fringes paid or made
available on or after January 1, 2001, for calendar years on or after
January 1, 2001, that are not includable in the gross income of the
employee by reason of 26 U.S.C. sec. 132(f)(4); and
(c) Excludes:
1. Living allowances, expense reimbursements, lump-sum payments for
accrued vacation leave, sick leave except as provided in KRS 78.616(5),
and other items determined by the board;
2. For employees who begin participating on or after September 1, 2008,
lump-sum payments for compensatory time;
3. Training incentive payments for city officers paid as set out in KRS
64.5277 to 64.5279;
4. For employees who begin participating on or after August 1, 2016,
nominal fees paid for services as a volunteer; and
5. Any salary or wages paid to an employee for services as a Kentucky
State Police school resource officer as defined by KRS 158.441;
(14) "Final compensation" means:
(a) For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, who is
Page 21 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
employed in a nonhazardous position, the creditable compensation of the
member during the five (5) fiscal years he or she was paid at the highest
average monthly rate divided by the number of months of service credit
during that five (5) year period multiplied by twelve (12). The five (5) years
may be fractional and need not be consecutive. If the number of months of
service credit during the five (5) year period is less than forty-eight (48), one
(1) or more additional fiscal years shall be used;
(b) For a member who is employed in a nonhazardous position, whose effective
retirement date is between August 1, 2001, and January 1, 2009, and whose
total service credit is at least twenty-seven (27) years and whose age and years
of service total at least seventy-five (75), final compensation means the
creditable compensation of the member during the three (3) fiscal years the
member was paid at the highest average monthly rate divided by the number
of months of service credit during that three (3) year period multiplied by
twelve (12). The three (3) years may be fractional and need not be
consecutive. If the number of months of service credit during the three (3)
year period is less than twenty-four (24), one (1) or more additional fiscal
years shall be used;
(c) For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, who is
employed in a hazardous position, as provided in KRS 78.5520, the creditable
compensation of the member during the three (3) fiscal years he or she was
paid at the highest average monthly rate divided by the number of months of
service credit during that three (3) year period multiplied by twelve (12). The
three (3) years may be fractional and need not be consecutive. If the number
of months of service credit during the three (3) year period is less than twenty-
four (24), one (1) or more additional fiscal years, which may contain less than
twelve (12) months of service credit, shall be used;
Page 22 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
(d) For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but
prior to January 1, 2014, who is employed in a nonhazardous position, the
creditable compensation of the member during the five (5) complete fiscal
years immediately preceding retirement divided by five (5). Each fiscal year
used to determine final compensation must contain twelve (12) months of
service credit. If the member does not have five (5) complete fiscal years that
each contain twelve (12) months of service credit, then one (1) or more
additional fiscal years, which may contain less than twelve (12) months of
service credit, shall be added until the number of months in the final
compensation calculation is at least sixty (60) months; or
(e) For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but
prior to January 1, 2014, who is employed in a hazardous position as provided
in KRS 78.5520, the creditable compensation of the member during the three
(3) complete fiscal years he or she was paid at the highest average monthly
rate divided by three (3). Each fiscal year used to determine final
compensation must contain twelve (12) months of service credit. If the
member does not have three (3) complete fiscal years that each contain twelve
(12) months of service credit, then one (1) or more additional fiscal years,
which may contain less than twelve (12) months of service credit, shall be
added until the number of months in the final compensation calculation is at
least thirty-six (36) months;
(15) "Final rate of pay" means the actual rate upon which earnings of an employee were
calculated during the twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the
member's effective retirement date, and shall include employee contributions
picked up after August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS 78.610(4). The rate shall be
certified to the system by the employer and the following equivalents shall be used
to convert the rate to an annual rate: two thousand eighty (2,080) hours for eight (8)
Page 23 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
hour workdays, one thousand nine hundred fifty (1,950) hours for seven and one-
half (7.5) hour workdays, two hundred sixty (260) days, fifty-two (52) weeks,
twelve (12) months, one (1) year;
(16) "Retirement allowance" means the retirement payments to which a member is
entitled;
(17) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the
basis of the actuarial tables adopted by the board. In cases of disability retirement,
the options authorized by KRS 61.635 shall be computed by adding ten (10) years
to the age of the member, unless the member has chosen the Social Security
adjustment option as provided for in KRS 61.635(8), in which case the member's
actual age shall be used. For members who begin participating in the system prior
to January 1, 2014, no disability retirement option shall be less than the same option
computed under early retirement;
(18) "Normal retirement date", unless otherwise provided in KRS 78.510 to 78.852,
means:
(a) For a member with service in a nonhazardous position, the sixty-fifth birthday
of a member;
(b) For a member with service in a hazardous position who begins participating
before September 1, 2008, the first day of the month following a member's
fifty-fifth birthday; or
(c) For a member with service in a hazardous position who begins participating
on or after September 1, 2008, the first day of the month following a
member's sixtieth birthday;
(19) "Fiscal year" of the system means the twelve (12) months from July 1 through the
following June 30, which shall also be the plan year. The "fiscal year" shall be the
limitation year used to determine contribution and benefits limits as set out in 26
U.S.C. sec. 415;
Page 24 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
(20) "Agency reporting official" means the person designated by the participating
employer who shall be responsible for forwarding all employer and employee
contributions and a record of the contributions to the system and for performing
other administrative duties pursuant to KRS 78.510 to 78.852;
(21) "Regular full-time positions," as used in subsection (6) of this section, shall mean
all positions that average one hundred (100) or more hours per month, determined
by using the number of hours actually worked in a calendar or fiscal year, or eighty
(80) or more hours per month in the case of noncertified employees of school
boards, determined by using the number of hours actually worked in a calendar or
school year, unless otherwise specified, except:
(a) Seasonal positions, which although temporary in duration, are positions which
coincide in duration with a particular season or seasons of the year and that
may recur regularly from year to year, in which case the period of time shall
not exceed nine (9) months, except for employees of school boards, in which
case the period of time shall not exceed six (6) months;
(b) Emergency positions which are positions utilized by the employer during:
1. An emergency as determined by the employer for a period not
exceeding thirty (30) working days and are nonrenewable; or
2. A state of emergency declared by the President of the United States or
the Governor of the Commonwealth of Kentucky that are created or
filled specifically for addressing the employer's needs during and as a
result of the declared emergency;
(c) Temporary positions that are positions of employment with a participating
agency for a period of time not to exceed twelve (12) months and not
renewable;
(d) Probationary positions which are positions of employment with a participating
employer that do not exceed twelve (12) months and that are used uniformly
Page 25 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
by the participating agency on new employees who would otherwise be
eligible for participation in the system. Probationary positions shall not be
renewable by the participating employer for the same employee, unless the
employee has not been employed with the participating employer for a period
of at least twelve (12) months; or
(e) Part-time positions that are positions that may be permanent in duration, but
that require less than a calendar or fiscal year average of one hundred (100)
hours of work per month, determined by using the number of months actually
worked within a calendar or fiscal year, in the performance of duty, except in
case of noncertified employees of school boards, the school term average shall
be eighty (80) hours of work per month, determined by using the number of
months actually worked in a calendar or school year, in the performance of
duty;
(22) "Alternate participation plan" means a method of participation in the system as
provided for by KRS 78.530(3);
(23) "Retired member" means any former member receiving a retirement allowance or
any former member who has on file at the retirement office the necessary
documents for retirement benefits and is no longer contributing to the system;
(24) "Current rate of pay" means the member's actual hourly, daily, weekly, biweekly,
monthly, or yearly rate of pay converted to an annual rate as defined in final rate of
pay. The rate shall be certified by the employer;
(25) "Beneficiary" means the person, persons, estate, trust, or trustee designated by the
member in accordance with KRS 61.542 or 61.705 to receive any available benefits
in the event of the member's death. As used in KRS 78.5536, beneficiary shall not
mean an estate, trust, or trustee;
(26) "Recipient" means the retired member, the person or persons designated as
beneficiary by the member and drawing a retirement allowance as a result of the
Page 26 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
member's death, or a dependent child drawing a retirement allowance. An alternate
payee of a qualified domestic relations order shall not be considered a recipient,
except for purposes of KRS 61.623;
(27) "Person" means a natural person;
(28) "School term or year" means the twelve (12) months from July 1 through the
following June 30;
(29) "Retirement office" means the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority office building
in Frankfort, unless otherwise designated by the Kentucky Public Pensions
Authority;
(30) "Vested" for purposes of determining eligibility for purchasing service credit under
KRS 61.552 means the employee has at least forty-eight (48) months of service if
age sixty-five (65) or older or at least sixty (60) months of service if under the age
of sixty-five (65). For purposes of this subsection, "service" means service in the
systems administered by the Kentucky Retirement Systems and County Employees
Retirement System;
(31) "Participating":
(a) Means an employee is currently earning service credit in the system as
provided in KRS 78.615; and
(b) Solely for the purpose of benefits payable to employees who become
disabled as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in this section,
or who die as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in this
section, or who die as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS
61.621, or who become disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as
defined in KRS 61.621, means a person is employed in a probationary
position as provided by subsection (21)(d) of this section;
(32) "Month" means a calendar month;
(33) "Membership date" means the date upon which the member began participating in
Page 27 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
the system as provided in KRS 78.615;
(34) "Participant" means a member, as defined by subsection (8) of this section, or a
retired member, as defined by subsection (23) of this section;
(35) "Qualified domestic relations order" means any judgment, decree, or order,
including approval of a property settlement agreement, that:
(a) Is issued by a court or administrative agency; and
(b) Relates to the provision of child support, alimony payments, or marital
property rights to an alternate payee;
(36) "Alternate payee" means a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a
participant, who is designated to be paid retirement benefits in a qualified domestic
relations order;
(37) "Accumulated employer credit" means the employer pay credit deposited to the
member's account and interest credited on such amounts as provided by KRS
78.5512 and 78.5516;
(38) "Accumulated account balance" means:
(a) For members who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014,
the member's accumulated contributions; or
(b) For members who began participating in the system on or after January 1,
2014, in the hybrid cash balance plan as provided by KRS 78.5512 and
78.5516, the combined sum of the member's accumulated contributions and
the member's accumulated employer credit;
(39) "Volunteer" means an individual who:
(a) Freely and without pressure or coercion performs hours of service for an
employer participating in one (1) of the systems administered by Kentucky
Retirement Systems or the County Employees Retirement System without
receipt of compensation for services rendered, except for reimbursement of
actual expenses, payment of a nominal fee to offset the costs of performing
Page 28 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
the voluntary services, or both; and
(b) If a retired member, does not become an employee, leased employee, or
independent contractor of the employer for which he or she is performing
volunteer services for a period of at least twelve (12) months following the
retired member's most recent retirement date;
(40) "Nominal fee" means compensation earned for services as a volunteer that does not
exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per month with each participating employer.
Compensation earned for services as a volunteer from more than one (1)
participating employer during a month shall not be aggregated to determine whether
the compensation exceeds the five hundred dollars ($500) per month maximum
provided by this subsection;
(41) "Nonhazardous position" means a position that does not meet the requirements of
KRS 78.5520 or has not been approved by the board as a hazardous position;
(42) "Hazardous position" means a position that meets the requirements of KRS 78.5520
and has been approved by the board as hazardous;
(43) "Level-percentage-of-payroll amortization method" means a method of determining
the annual amortization payment on the unfunded actuarial accrued liability as
expressed as a percentage of payroll over a set period of years. Under this method,
the percentage of payroll shall be projected to remain constant for all years
remaining in the set period and the unfunded actuarially accrued liability shall be
projected to be fully amortized at the conclusion of the set period;
(44) "Increment" means twelve (12) months of service credit which are purchased. The
twelve (12) months need not be consecutive. The final increment may be less than
twelve (12) months;
(45) "Last day of paid employment" means the last date employer and employee
contributions are required to be reported in accordance with KRS 16.543, 61.543, or
78.615 to the retirement office in order for the employee to receive current service
Page 29 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
credit for the month. Last day of paid employment does not mean a date the
employee receives payment for accrued leave, whether by lump sum or otherwise,
if that date occurs twenty-four (24) or more months after previous contributions;
(46) "Objective medical evidence" means reports of examinations or treatments; medical
signs which are anatomical, physiological, or psychological abnormalities that can
be observed; psychiatric signs which are medically demonstrable phenomena
indicating specific abnormalities of behavior, affect, thought, memory, orientation,
or contact with reality; or laboratory findings which are anatomical, physiological,
or psychological phenomena that can be shown by medically acceptable laboratory
diagnostic techniques, including but not limited to chemical tests,
electrocardiograms, electroencephalograms, X-rays, and psychological tests;
(47) "Hazardous disability" as used in KRS 78.510 to 78.852 means a disability which
results in an employee's total incapacity to continue as an employee in a hazardous
position, but the employee is not necessarily deemed to be totally and permanently
disabled to engage in other occupations for remuneration or profit;
(48) "Act in line of duty" means, for employees in hazardous positions under KRS
78.5520:
(a) A single act occurring which was required in the performance of the principal
duties of the hazardous position as defined by the job description; or
(b) A single act of violence committed against the employee that is found to be
related to his or her job duties, whether or not it occurs at his or her job site;
(49) "Dependent child" means a child in the womb and a natural or legally adopted child
of the member who has neither attained age eighteen (18) nor married or who is an
unmarried full-time student who has not attained age twenty-two (22). Solely in the
case of a member who dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in
this section, dies as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621,
becomes totally and permanently disabled as a direct result of an act in the line of
Page 30 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
duty as defined in this section, or becomes disabled as a result of a duty-related
injury as defined in KRS 61.621 and is eligible for the benefits provided by KRS
61.621(5)(a), "dependent child" also means a naturally or legally adopted disabled
child of the member, regardless of the child's age, if the child has been determined
to be eligible for federal Social Security disability benefits or is being claimed as a
qualifying child for tax purposes due to the child's total and permanent disability;
(50) "Normal retirement age" means the age at which the member meets the
requirements for his or her normal retirement date as provided by subsection (18) of
this section;
(51) "Disability retirement date" means the first day of the month following the last day
of paid employment;
(52) "Monthly average pay" means:
(a) In the case of a member who dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as
defined in KRS 16.505 or who dies as a result of a duty-related injury as
defined in KRS 61.621, the higher of the member's monthly final rate of pay
or the average monthly creditable compensation earned by the deceased
member during his or her last twelve (12) months of employment; or
(b) In the case where a member becomes totally and permanently disabled as a
direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505 or becomes
disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621 and is
eligible for the benefits provided by KRS 61.621(5)(a), the higher of the
member's monthly final rate of pay or the average monthly creditable
compensation earned by the disabled member during his or her last twelve
(12) months of employment prior to the date the act in line of duty or duty-
related injury occurred;
(53) "Authority" means the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority as provided by KRS
61.505;
Page 31 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1167
(54) "Executive director" means the executive director of the Kentucky Public Pensions
Authority; and
(55) "Gainful employment" means work in any capacity that is or may be performed
with regularity and is or may be usually done for pay, whether pay is received or
not received, including seasonal, volunteer, part-time, and on-call work.
Page 32 of 32
BR116700.100 - 1167 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:40 PM Jacketed